Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.110

Collection of assessments—Rule-making authority—Assessment imposed under RCW 15.26.120.

The assessments on fresh apples shall be paid, or provision made therefor satisfactory to the commission, at the time of shipment, and no fresh apples shall be carried, transported, or shipped by any person or by any carrier, railroad, truck, boat, or other conveyance until the assessment has been paid or provision made therefor satisfactory to the commission.

The commission shall by rule prescribe the method of collection of the assessment.

The commission may also collect assessments imposed under RCW 15.26.120, and in that event, the commission shall establish and be reimbursed by the Washington tree fruit research commission an amount representing a reasonable approximation of the actual costs to the commission of such collection.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 15 s 9; 2004 c 178 s 12; 2002 c 313 s 124; 1967 c 240 s 29; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.110. Prior: 1937 c 195 s 12; RRS s 2874-12.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.